Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-572
Sections; severability; validity.

Should the courts of the state or of the United States declare any section, provision, paragraph, clause, sentence, phrase, or part thereof, of sections 46-501 to 46-573 invalid or unconstitutional, or in conflict with any other section, provision, paragraph, clause, sentence, phrase, or part thereof, declared to be unconstitutional or unauthorized, the same shall not affect any other part whatsoever of sections 46-501 to 46-573. The Legislature hereby declares that it would have passed sections 46-501 to 46-573 and each section, provision, paragraph, clause, sentence, or phrase hereof irrespective of the fact that any one or more of the other sections, provisions, paragraphs, clauses, sentences, or phrases, or parts thereof, be declared invalid or unconstitutional.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 38, p. 557.

This section provides an all-inclusive saving clause. Nebraska Mid-State Reclamation District v. Hall County, 152 Neb. 410, 41 N.W.2d 397 (1950).